apertium-kaa.kaa.lexc
LEXICON SUBST

N-INFL-COMMON ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON N1-ABBR

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>:%- POSSESSIVES ;
%<n%>:%- CASES-ETC ;
%<n%>: CASES-ETC ; ! Dir/LR

LEXICON N1

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
! %<n%>:%{ъ%} SUBST ;
%<n%>:%{ъ%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON

:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ;
POSSESSIVES ;       ! for stuff like "біздің aуa рaйымыз" and even "oның aуa рaйы",
                  ! which should have a <px3sp> analysis


LEXICON N-COMPOUND-PX ! consider "N2" for the name
                      ! equiv of kir:LEXICON N-INFL-3PX-COMPOUND

%<n%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} CASES-ETC ; ! (e.g. чик сaкчылaры=пoгрaничники)
                                                      !  FIXME CHECK: Is {s} needed here ?

LEXICON N3
! Singularia tantum

%<n%>%<attr%>: # ;
%<n%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON N5

: N1 ;


!LEXICON NAT
! Nationalites

!A1 ;              ! nationality's adjectival form, e.g. "Turkish [food]" ! Consider <n.attr> reading for this 
!N1 ;              ! a member of the nationality, e.g. "A Turk"
!:%>sh%{A%} ADV ;   ! as / in the style of the nat., e.g. "à la Turk"
!:%>sh%{A%} ADV ;   ! in the language of the nationality, e.g. "in Turkish" ! I guess ADJ was meant /I.S./
!:%>sh%{A%} N1 ;    ! the language of the nationality, e.g. "Turkish"

LEXICON ADV-LANG

N1 ;
ADV ;

LEXICON NP-COMMON

N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-TOP

%<np%>%<top%>:%{ъ%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<top%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F

%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>:%{ъ%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>%<attr%>: # ;


LEXICON NP-ANT-M

%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>:%{ъ%} NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF

! Dual-gender cognoms.
! Don't derive anything /I.S./

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r NP-COMMON ;

LEXICON NP-COG-OV

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>%<attr%>: # ;

%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:a NP-COMMON ;
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>%<attr%>:a # ;

LEXICON NP-ORG

%<np%>%<org%>: CASES ; 

LEXICON NP-ORG-COMPOUND 

%<np%>%<org%>: N-COMPOUND-PX-COMMON ;   ! COMMON because no plural

LEXICON NP-AL

%<np%>%<al%>:%{ъ%} CASES ;
%<np%>%<al%>%<attr%>: # ;


LEXICON A1                
! adjectives that can be both substantivised and adverbialised;
! all three readings (<adj>, <adj.subst> and <adj.advl>) have comparison levels.
!# жaқсы, тeз

%<adj%>:%{ъ%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%{ъ%}%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ; !CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   

%<adj%>%<subst%>:%{ъ%} SUBST ;                             
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%{ъ%}%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} SUBST ;   

%<adj%>%<advl%>:%{ъ%} CLIT ; ! COMMON-CLITICS ;                               
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<advl%>:%{ъ%}%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} CLIT ; !COMMON-CLITICS ;     

LEXICON A2

%<adj%>: CLITICS-INCL-COP ;                             !# eскі дoс
%<adj%>%<comp%>:%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# eскірeк заманда

%<adj%>%<subst%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;                             !# "Ол eскіні eртeдeн eсіндe сақтаған, жаңаның жалынды жаршысы бoлған ақын."
%<adj%>%<comp%>%<subst%>:%>%{I%}r%{A%}%{K%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;   !# "Ихтимал, бу бина башкасы, искeрәгe урынында утырадыр."


LEXICON A3                 
! (derived/not fully lexicalised) adjectives without adverbial reading,
! so-called "predicatives" (бaр, жoқ);
! no comparison levels at all.
!# көктeмгі, бaсты, бaр, жoқ

%<adj%>:%{ъ%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   
%<adj%>%<subst%>:%{ъ%} SUBST ;           
                                    
LEXICON A4 
! "pure" adjectives - no adverbial and substantive readings, no comparison levels;
!# ұлттық

%<adj%>:%{ъ%} CLITICS-INCL-COP ;   !# ұлттық тaғaм


LEXICON V-ADJ

# ;
%<subst%>: GER-INFL ; ! Dont't be confused by the name of the cont.class,
                      ! it's basically just a simplified FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION


LEXICON V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}n COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>s%{A%}n%{ъ%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{M%}%{I%}z COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}zl%{I%}r COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%}z COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%}zl%{A%}r COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S1

! Used for: -AR-<fut>, -GAn-<past>, -MAK-<fut_plan>, copula

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-S2

! Used for: -DI-<ifi>, -sA-<prc_cond>, -sA-<gna_cond>

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>n%{ъ%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>%{K%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>n%{ъ%}l%{A%}r COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;

%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>n%{ъ%}%{I%}z COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>n%{ъ%}l%{A%}r COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON V-PERS-AOR

! As the name indicates, used for -{E}-<aor>
! NOTE that: Alma teatrg'a bara<aor><p3><sg> ma? – Алмa в тeaтр идёт?

V-PERS-S1-NO3PERSON ;
%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m COMMON-CLITICS ;                    ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>d%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>: CLIT-QST-MA ;              ! Dir/LR
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>d%{I%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: CLIT-QST-MA ;              ! Dir/LR ;

LEXICON VOL-ENDINGS

%<p1%>%<sg%>:%>m CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p2%>%<sg%>:%>ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<sg%>:%>s%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p1%>%<pl%>:%>m%{I%}z CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p2%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>s%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p3%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%} CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;             ! Dir/LR

!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<sg%>:%>ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;
!%<p2%>%<frm%>%<pl%>:%>л%{A%}р%>%{I%}ң%{I%}з CLIT-GHANA-ETC ;

LEXICON V-MAKTA-INFL

%<p3%>%<sg%>: # ;
%<p3%>%<pl%>: # ;

LEXICON KI

%<attr%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{I%} CLIT ; ! COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<subst%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{I%} N-INFL-COMMON ;

LEXICON ADV

%<adv%>:%{ъ%} CLIT ; ! COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON ADV-WITH-KI

ADV ;
%<adv%>: KI ;

!!!!!!!   G E R U N D S   I N F L E C T I O N

! This is a somewhat simplified version of N-INFL-COMMON.
! The idea was to avoid overgeneration (I don't think that ger+DAGI would take
! case endings e.g. Same for ger+NIKI). Still, this cont.class might be not
! suitable for all of the gerunds. /IS/

LEXICON GER-CASE-NO_COPULA

CASES-COMMON ;
%<nom%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<abl%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}n COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%} COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON GER-ATTR/SUBST

%<attr%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<subst%>: CASES ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r CASES ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST

!%<attr%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<advl%>: COMMON-CLITICS ;
!%<subst%>: CASE-2 ;
!%<subst%>%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}р CASE-2 ;

LEXICON GER-ABE-ETC          ! Stuff which doesn't appear after possessives

%+sız%<post%>:%>s%{I%}z GER-ABE-ATTR/ADVL/SUBST ;

LEXICON GER-GENPOSS-ETC      ! Stuff which can appear after possessives too

%<px%>:%>%{N%}iki%{n%} COMMON-CLITICS ;
%<loc%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}%{G%}%{ъ%}%{I%} GER-ATTR/SUBST ;
%<sim%>:%>%{D%}%{A%}y COMMON-CLITICS ;

LEXICON GER-CASE-ETC
	
GER-CASE-NO_COPULA ;
GER-GENPOSS-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-POSSESSIVES

%<px1sg%>:%>%{I%}m GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2sg%>:%>%{I%}n%' GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px3sp%>:%>%{s%}%{I%}%{n%} GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px1pl%>:%>%{I%}m%{I%}z GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>:%>%{I%}n%'l%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;

%<px2sg%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}n%'%{I%}z GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<px2pl%>%<frm%>:%>%{I%}n%'%{I%}zl%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;

LEXICON GER-INFL

GER-POSSESSIVES ;
GER-CASE-ETC ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r GER-POSSESSIVES ;
%<pl%>:%>l%{A%}r GER-CASE-ETC ;
GER-ABE-ETC ;


LEXICON V-FINITE-REGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<aor%>:%>%{E%}  V-PERS-AOR ;
%<past%>:%>%{G%}%{ъ%}%{A%}n  V-PERS-S1 ;
%<ifi%>:%>%{D%}%{I%} V-PERS-S2 ;
! %<ifi_evid%>:%>%{I%}p !V-PERS-IFI_EVID ;
! %<fut_plan%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%} V-PERS-S1 ;

LEXICON V-FINITE-IRREGULAR_NEGATIVE

%<fut%>:%>%{A%}r V-PERS-S1 ;
%<neg%>%<fut%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}s V-PERS-S1 ;

%<prog%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}t%{A%} V-MAKTA-INFL ;
!%<neg%>%<prog%>:%>%{M%}%{A%}%{K%}t%{A%}% emes V-MAKTA-INFL ;  ! FIXME: negative form

 LEXICON Nouns
bug%'a:bug%'a N1 ; ! ""
Budda:budda N3 ; ! ""
Buddizm:Buddizm N5 ; ! ""
em:em N1 ; ! ""
hawa% rayı:hawa% ray N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! ""
imperialist:imperialis N5 ; ! "imperialist" ! Dir/LR
imperialist:imperialist N5 ; ! "imperialist"
iyun:iyun%{ь%} N1 ; ! ""
lamait:lamait N5 ; ! ""
qa%'wipsizlik:qa%'wipsizlik N1 ; ! ""
avtoko%'lik:avtoko%'lik N1 ; ! ""
aktiv:aktiv N5 ; ! ""
du%'nya% ju%'zi:du%'nya% ju%'z N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "world"
du%'nya% ju%'z:du%'nya% ju%'z  N-COMPOUND-PX ; ! "world"
jarıq:jarıq N1 ; ! ""
metabuddizm:metabuddizm N5 ; !
neft:neft N1 ; ! ""
tıyım:tıyım N1 ; ! ""
tik% jar:tik% jar N1 ; ! ""
mlrd:mlrd%{а%}%{с%} N1-ABBR ; ! "billion"
km:km%{э%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "km"
mm:mm%{э%}%{з%} N1-ABBR ; ! "km"
 LEXICON ProperNouns
Shveytsariya:Shveytsariya NP-TOP ; ! ""
İrlandiya:İrlandiya NP-TOP ; ! ""
Bozataw:Bozataw NP-TOP ; ! ""
Qırg%'ızstan:Qırg%'ızstan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Amerika:Amerika NP-TOP ; ! ""
Tu%'rkmenistan:Tu%'rkmenistan NP-TOP ; ! ""
Da%'wletyarbek:Da%'wletyarbek NP-TOP ; ! ""
Ob:Ob NP-TOP ; ! "Ob river"
To%'lepbergen:To%'lepbergen NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Dimna:Dimna NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Ayjamal:Ayjamal NP-ANT-F ; ! "Ayjamal" (Kazakh)
Aymaq:Aymaq NP-ANT-M ; ! "Aymaq" (Kazakh)
Aysholpan:Aysholpan NP-ANT-F ; ! "Aysholpan" (Kazakh)
Altın:Altın NP-ANT-F ; ! "Altın" (Kazakh)
Danıshpan:Danıshpan NP-ANT-M ; ! "Danıshpan" (Arabic)
Dara:Dara NP-ANT-F ; ! "Dara" (Kazakh)
Maysa:Maysa NP-ANT-F ; ! "Maysa" (Persian)
Mereke:Mereke NP-ANT-M ; ! "Mereke" (Kazakh)
Raxima:Raxima NP-ANT-F ; ! "Raxıyma" (Arabic)
Shug%'a:Shug%'a NP-ANT-F ; ! "Shuğa" (Kazakh)
Da%'wqaraev:Da%'wqaraev NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Qayipbergenov:Qayipbergenov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Kojurov:Kojurov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Qayıpbergenov:Qayıpbergenov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Erpolatov:Erpolatov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Xojaniyazov:Xojaniyazov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Qurbanov:Qurbanov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Medvedev:Medvedev NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
van% Gog:van% Gog NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
da% Vinchi:da% Vinchi NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Djobs:Djobs NP-COG-MF ; ! "Jobs"
Tsukerberg:Tsukerberg NP-COG-MF ; ! "Zuckerberg"
Geyts:Geyts NP-COG-MF ; ! "Gates"
Real% Madrid:Real% Madrid NP-ORG ; ! ""
Google:Google NP-ORG ; ! ""
Sony:Sony NP-ORG ; ! ""
Apple:Apple NP-ORG ; ! ""
Samsung:Samsung NP-ORG ; ! ""
Nokia:Nokia NP-ORG ; ! ""
Motorola:Motorola NP-ORG ; ! ""
Philips:Philips NP-ORG ; ! ""
GlaxoSmithKline:GlaxoSmithKline NP-AL ; ! ""
Galaxy:Galaxy NP-AL ; ! ""
Windows:Windows NP-AL ; ! ""
iOS:iOS NP-AL ; ! ""
iPad:iPad NP-AL ; ! ""
Facebook:Facebook NP-AL ; ! ""
YouTube:YouTube NP-AL ; ! ""
iPod:iPod NP-AL ; ! ""
A%'bdiraman:A%'bdiraman NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Baltabek:Baltabek NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Konstantin:Konstantin NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Simon:Simon NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adjectives
hasıl:hasıl A3 ; ! ""
atalmısh:atalmısh A4 ; ! ""
ashshı:ashshı A2 ; ! ""
bar:bar A3 ; ! ""
batpaqlı:batpaqlı A2 ; ! ""
birjaqlı:birjaqlı A1 ; ! ""
geologiyalıq:geologiyalıq A4 ; ! ""
da%'meli:da%'meli A2 ; ! ""
a%'lemlik:a%'lemlik A4 ; ! ""
esen:esen A2 ; ! ""
jaylı:jaylı A1 ; ! ""
jeke:jeke A3 ; ! ""
iygilikli:iygilikli A1 ; ! ""
islamshıl:islamshıl A4 ; ! ""
ka%'siplik:ka%'siplik A3 ; ! ""
gu%'nalı:gu%'nalı A2 ; ! ""
go%'ne:go%'ne A1 ; ! ""
ma%'s:ma%'s A2 ; ! ""
mexanik:mexanik A4 ; ! ""
mu%'mkin:mu%'mkin A3 ; ! ""
mıqlı:mıqlı A1 ; ! ""
poeziyalıq:poeziyalıq A4 ; ! ""
su%'yikli:su%'yikli A3 ; ! ""
su%'ykimli:su%'ykimli A2 ; ! ""
suyıq:suyıq A1 ; ! ""
paydasız:paydasız A4 ; ! ""
tolı:tolı A2 ; ! ""
tung%'ısh:tung%'ısh A1 ; ! ""
turg%'ın:turg%'ın A3 ; ! ""
dos:dos A3 ; ! ""
ıssı:ıssı A1 ; ! ""
epikalıq:epikalıq A4 ; ! ""
 LEXICON Adverbs
ana% ret:ana% ret ADV ; ! ""
anda%-sanda:anda%-sanda ADV ; ! ""
nagu%'man:nagu%'man ADV ; ! ""
keyinnen:keyinnen ADV ; ! ""
oyımsha:oyımsha ADV ; ! ""
to%'mendegidey:to%'mendegidey ADV ; ! ""
ha%'zirshe:ha%'zirshe ADV ; ! ""
keyin:keyin ADV ; ! " after" !Use/MT
bıyıl:bıyıl ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "this year > this year's"
burın:burın ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "earlier"
bıltır:bıltır ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "last year > last year's"
endi:endi ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "contrastive now > the one now"
keyin:keyin ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "after"   FIXME: takes comparative
kesh:kesh ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "evening/late"
tan%'% erten%':tan%'% erten%' ADV-WITH-KI ; ! "morning"
